Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-307
Elective officers; bond or insurance.

All elective officers of a city of the primary class, except city council members, shall give a good and sufficient bond or evidence of equivalent insurance in an amount to be fixed by ordinance, for the faithful performance of their duties. Each city council member before entering upon the duties of his or her office shall give a bond or evidence of equivalent insurance in favor of the city in the sum of two thousand dollars. If a bond is given, it shall be signed by a surety company or by two or more good and sufficient sureties who are residents of such city, who shall justify that he or she is worth at least two thousand dollars over and above his or her debts, liabilities, and exemptions, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duties of the city council members and conditioned further that if the city council members vote for an expenditure of money or the creation of any liability in excess of the amount allowed by law, or vote for the transfer of any sum of money from one fund to another where such transfer is not allowed by law, such city council members and surety or sureties signing the bonds shall be liable thereon.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 16, p. 76;

R.S.1913, § 4484;

C.S.1922, § 3870;

C.S.1929, § 15-307;

R.S.1943, § 15-307;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 85.

Joint control of funds by principal and surety on bond, see section 11-130.